Washington statutes.
RCW 35.49.040

Payment without interest or penalty.

The owner of any lot, tract, or parcel of land or other property charged with local improvement assessment may redeem it from all or any portion thereof by paying to the city or town treasurer all or any portion thereof without interest within thirty days after the first publication by the treasurer of notice that the assessment roll is in his or her hands for collection.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2086; 1965 c 7 s 35.49.040. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 50, part; RRS s 9403, part.]